Massachusetts, session 194th, H2889.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws are hereby amended in Chapter 40B by inserting after Section 30 the
following section:-
SECTION 31. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings: --
“Agency”, shall mean the Berkshire Regional Planning Commission, the Central
Massachusetts Regional Planning Commission, the Franklin Regional Council of Governments,
the Merrimack Valley Planning Commission, the Montachusett Regional Planning Commission,
the Northern Middlesex Council of Governments, the Old Colony Planning Council, the Pioneer
Valley Planning Commission and the Southeastern Regional Planning and Economic
Development District.
of 2

(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, an agency that is a
member of the state retirement system pursuant to chapter 32 of the General Laws shall be
deemed to be or shall continue to be a member of the state retirement system.
(c) An agency shall not be required to annually reimburse the state board of retirement
for its pro rata share of any retirement allowance or pension paid by said board during the
preceding calendar year which is based on whole or in part on service with such district provided
that each agency contributes the required accumulated deductions and interest to the annuity
savings accounts of the agency.
(d) An agency shall not be held liable for any past due contributions.
of 2